Utah statutes.
38-1-36.   Construction notice does not impart notice.

The filing of a document in the database is not intended to give notice to all persons of the content of the document within the meaning of Section 57-3-102 and does not constitute constructive notice of matters relating to real property to purchasers for value and without knowledge.

